Massachusetts, session 194th, H4008.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Massachusetts General Law Chapter
64N, Section 3 or any regulation, general or special law to the contrary, the City of Salem may,
upon the majority vote of its City Council, increase the local option tax from 3% to up to 6% on
the retail sale of marijuana and marijuana products by a marijuana retailer to anyone other than a
marijuana establishment. Further, in the event the Salem City Council increases the local option
tax to an amount in excess of 3%, the City and its marijuana establishments shall be relieved of
their obligation found within Massachusetts General Law Chapter 94G, Section 3(d) or any
regulation, general or special law, to negotiate and execute a host community agreement setting
forth the conditions to have a marijuana establishment within the City of Salem.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1